Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB19.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The indigo milk cap is named and designated as the official state mushroom of Kentucky.
Became law without Governor's signature April 9, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version